Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state board of education, the Washington professional educator standards board, the Washington state charter school commission, and the financial education public-private partnership were established as independent agencies at separate times, and have been administratively housed within the office of the superintendent of public instruction for purposes of administrative efficiency. The legislature also finds that because these education agencies have differing operational needs, they may be better served by an entity such as small agency services, which was established as a unit within the department of enterprise services in 2014 for the purpose of acting as the administrative agent for small agencies.Further, the legislature finds that, in accordance with its intent in creating independent entities, these education agencies have unique policy and programmatic roles, and that it is in the public interest for them to be efficient and reliable in developing policies, providing services, and managing resources.Therefore, the legislature intends to remove the requirement obligating the state board of education, the Washington professional educator standards board, the Washington state charter school commission, and the financial education public-private partnership to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes, and to promote their transition to operational independence and the securing of administrative services in a manner that optimizes each agency's business needs efficiently and effectively.PART IOPERATIONAL INDEPENDENCENEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) In order to ensure an effective and efficient transition of administrative services, and in recognition of their independent status, beginning in July 2026, the office of financial management shall coordinate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, the Washington professional educator standards board, the financial education public-private partnership, and the Washington state charter school commission for the purposes of supporting a transition to operational independence with separate administrative services. The office of financial management shall also coordinate with other agencies as necessary to implement this section. Transition supports to these education agencies must include, but are not limited to, assistance establishing accounts and agreements for state administrative services with small agency services, the state auditor's office, the attorney general's office, and other necessary entities.(2) The state board of education, the Washington professional educator standards board, the financial education public-private partnership, and the Washington state charter school commission shall each establish policies, procedures, and controls necessary to transition to operational independence with separate administration of each education agency's business services.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative services at a level commensurate with the business needs for each education agency listed in subsection (2) of this section through the 2027 fiscal year, and provide each agency with necessary information and documentation in time to meet their planning needs and ensure an effective and efficient transition to operational independence with separate administrative services.PART IISEPARATION OF OPERATIONAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE DUTIESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Effective July 1, 2027, the state board of education, the Washington professional educator standards board, the financial education public-private partnership, and the Washington state charter school commission shall exercise their authority to operate independently and make provisions for separate administrative services. In implementing the requirements of this section, these education agencies may contract for all or any portion of their administrative services.STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONSec. 4. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2024 c 66 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:The purpose of the state board of education, an independent state agency with statutory origins predating statehood, is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;(4) Establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements;(5) For purposes of statewide accountability:(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students who are not meeting academic standards as defined in RCW 28A.165.015, disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through 12. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;(b)(i)(A) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment, and the SAT or the ACT if used to demonstrate career and college readiness under RCW 28A.230.710. The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;(B) To permit the legislature to take any statutory action it deems warranted before modified or newly established scores are implemented, the board shall notify the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate of any scores that are modified or established under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection on or after July 28, 2019. The notifications required by this subsection (5)(b)(i)(B) must be provided by November 30th of the year proceeding the beginning of the school year in which the modified or established scores will take effect;(ii) The legislature intends to continue the implementation of chapter 22, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. when the legislature expressed the intent for the state board of education to identify the student performance standard that demonstrates a student's career and college readiness for the 11th grade consortium-developed assessments. Therefore, by December 1, 2018, the state board of education, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, must identify and report to the governor and the education policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the equivalent student performance standard that a 10th grade student would need to achieve on the state assessments to be on track to be career and college ready at the end of the student's high school experience;(iii) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary, middle, and high school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous 10 years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's website;(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through 12. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;(7) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;(8) Hire an executive director ((and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020)). The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ an administrative assistant and other necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all ((but one of the)) other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and(9) Adopt a seal ((that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).Sec. 5. RCW 28A.300.020 and 2005 c 497 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent of public instruction may appoint assistant superintendents of public instruction, a deputy superintendent of public instruction, and may employ such other assistants and clerical help as are necessary to carry out the duties of the superintendent ((and the state board of education. However, the superintendent shall employ without undue delay the executive director of the state board of education and other state board of education office assistants and clerical help, appointed by the state board under RCW 28A.305.130, whose positions are allotted and funded in accordance with moneys appropriated exclusively for the operation of the state board of education. The rate of compensation and termination of any such executive director, state board office assistants, and clerical help shall be subject to the prior consent of the state board of education)). The assistant superintendents, deputy superintendent, and such other officers and employees as are exempted from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent ((or at the pleasure of the superintendent and the state board of education as provided in this section. Expenditures by the superintendent of public instruction for direct and indirect support of the state board of education are valid operational expenditures by and in behalf of the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the superintendent of public instruction held on behalf of the state board of education must be delivered to the custody of the state board of education. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, and other tangible property purchased on behalf of the state board of education must be made available to the state board of education. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties of the state board of education must be assigned to the state board of education.(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of the state board of education must, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the state board of education.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions of the state board of education, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.(2) All employees of the office of the superintendent of public instruction employed on behalf of the state board of education are transferred to the jurisdiction of the state board of education subject to review by the executive director of the state board of education. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the state board of education to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.(3) All existing contracts and obligations executed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the state board of education remain in full force and must be managed by the state board of education.(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these entities shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.WASHINGTON PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARDSec. 7. RCW 28A.410.200 and 2017 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board is created as an independent state agency, consisting of twelve members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms and the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee. On August 1, 2009, the board shall be reduced to twelve members.(b) Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment or reappointment by the governor to terms of four years.(c) No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive full four-year terms.(d) The governor shall biennially appoint the chair of the board. No board member may serve as chair for more than four consecutive years.(2) A majority of the members of the board shall be active practitioners with the majority being classroom based. Membership on the board shall include individuals having one or more of the following:(a) Experience in one or more of the education roles for which state preparation program approval is required and certificates issued;(b) Experience providing or leading a state-approved teacher or educator preparation program;(c) Experience providing mentoring and coaching to education professionals or others; and(d) Education-related community experience.(3) In appointing board members, the governor shall consider the individual's commitment to quality education and the ongoing improvement of instruction, experiences in the public schools or private schools, involvement in developing quality teaching preparation and support programs, and vision for the most effective yet practical system of assuring teaching quality. The governor shall also consider the diversity of the population of the state.(4) All appointments to the board made by the governor are subject to confirmation by the senate.(5) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(6) The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.(7) Members of the board shall hire an executive director ((and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes only)). The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ an administrative assistant and other necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board.(8) Members of the board may create informal advisory groups as needed to inform the board's work.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the superintendent of public instruction held on behalf of the Washington professional educator standards board must be delivered to the custody of the Washington professional educator standards board. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, and other tangible property purchased on behalf of the Washington professional educator standards board must be made available to the Washington professional educator standards board. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties of the Washington professional educator standards board must be assigned to the Washington professional educator standards board.(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of the Washington professional educator standards board must, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the Washington professional educator standards board.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions of the Washington professional educator standards board, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.(2) All employees of the office of the superintendent of public instruction employed on behalf of the Washington professional educator standards board are transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington professional educator standards board subject to review by the executive director of the Washington professional educator standards board. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the Washington professional educator standards board to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.(3) All existing contracts and obligations executed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the Washington professional educator standards board remain in full force and must be performed by the Washington professional educator standards board.(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these entities shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.FINANCIAL EDUCATION PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPSec. 9. RCW 28A.300.450 and 2015 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((A))The financial education public-private partnership is established((, composed))as an independent state agency consisting of the following members:(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each caucus of the house of representatives appointed for a two-year term of service by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member from each caucus of the senate appointed for a two-year term of service by the president of the senate;(b) Four representatives from the private for-profit and nonprofit financial services sector, including at least one representative from the jumpstart coalition, to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the governor;(c) Four teachers to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the superintendent of public instruction, with one each representing the elementary, middle, secondary, and postsecondary education sectors;(d) A representative from the department of financial institutions to be appointed for a two-year term of service by the director;(e) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, with one involved in curriculum development and one involved in teacher professional development, to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the superintendent; and(f) The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee.(2) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members of the partnership from among the legislative members.(3) One-half of the members appointed under subsection (1)(b), (c), and (e) of this section shall be appointed for a one-year term beginning August 1, 2011, and a two-year term thereafter.(4)(a) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this purpose, ((the partnership may hire a staff person who shall reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes))the partnership may hire an executive director. Additional technical and logistical support may be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of financial institutions, the organizations composing the partnership, ((and)) other participants in the financial education public-private partnership, and other providers of administrative services as deemed appropriate by the partnership.(b) The partnership may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the partnership including, but not limited to, the authority to employ other necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the partnership.(5) The initial members of the partnership shall be appointed by August 1, 2011.(6) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive per diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.(7) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership shall be provided by the agency, association, or organization that member represents. Teachers appointed as members by the superintendent of public instruction may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from funds available in the Washington financial education public-private partnership account. If the attendance of a teacher member at an official meeting of the partnership results in a need for a school district to employ a substitute, payment for the substitute may be made by the ((superintendent of public instruction))partnership from funds available in the Washington financial education public-private partnership account. A school district must release a teacher member to attend an official meeting of the partnership if the partnership pays the district for a substitute or pays the travel expenses of the teacher member.(8) This section shall be implemented to the extent funds are available.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the superintendent of public instruction held on behalf of the financial education public-private partnership must be delivered to the custody of the financial education public-private partnership. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, and other tangible property purchased on behalf of the financial education public-private partnership must be made available to the financial education public-private partnership. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties of the financial education public-private partnership must be assigned to the financial education public-private partnership.(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of the financial education public-private partnership must, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the financial education public-private partnership.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions of the financial education public-private partnership, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.(2) All employees of the office of the superintendent of public instruction employed on behalf of the financial education public-private partnership are transferred to the jurisdiction of the financial education public-private partnership subject to review by the executive director of the financial education public-private partnership. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the financial education public-private partnership to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.(3) All existing contracts and obligations executed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the financial education public-private partnership remain in full force and must be performed by the financial education public-private partnership.(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these entities shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSIONSec. 11. RCW 28A.710.070 and 2023 c 356 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington state charter school commission is established as an independent state agency whose mission is to:(a) Authorize high quality charter public schools throughout the state, especially schools that are designed to expand opportunities for at-risk students;(b) Ensure the highest standards of accountability and oversight for these schools; and(c) Hold charter school boards accountable for: Ensuring that students of charter public schools have opportunities for academic success; and exercising effective educational, operational, and financial oversight of charter public schools.(2) The commission shall, through its management, supervision, and enforcement of the charter contracts and pursuant to applicable law, administer the charter schools it authorizes in the same manner as a school district board of directors administers other schools.(3)(a) The commission shall consist of:(i) Nine appointed members;(ii) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee; and(iii) The chair of the state board of education or the chair's designee.(b) Appointments to the commission shall be as follows: Three members shall be appointed by the governor; three members shall be appointed by the senate, with two members appointed by the leader of the largest caucus of the senate and one member appointed by the leader of the minority caucus of the senate; and three members shall be appointed by the house of representatives, with two members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member appointed by the leader of the minority caucus of the house of representatives. The appointing authorities shall assure diversity among commission members, including representation from various geographic areas of the state and shall assure that at least one member is the parent of a Washington public school student.(4) Members appointed to the commission shall collectively possess strong experience and expertise in public and nonprofit governance; management and finance; public school leadership, assessment, curriculum, and instruction; and public education law. All appointed members shall have demonstrated an understanding of and commitment to charter schooling as a strategy for strengthening public education.(5) Appointed members shall serve four-year, staggered terms. The initial appointments from each of the appointing authorities must consist of one member appointed to a one-year term, one member appointed to a two-year term, and one member appointed to a three-year term, all of whom thereafter may be reappointed for a four-year term. No appointed member may serve more than two consecutive terms. Initial appointments must be made by July 1, 2016.(6) Whenever a vacancy on the commission exists among its appointed membership, the original appointing authority must appoint a member for the remaining portion of the term within no more than thirty days.(7) Commission members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(8) The commission may hire an executive director and may employ staff as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter. The commission may delegate to the executive director the duties as necessary to effectively and efficiently execute the business of the commission, including the authority to employ necessary staff. In accordance with RCW 41.06.070, the executive director and the executive director's confidential secretary are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.(9) ((The commission shall reside within the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes only.(10))) RCW 28A.710.090 and 28A.710.120 do not apply to the commission.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 28A.710 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the superintendent of public instruction held on behalf of the commission must be delivered to the custody of the commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, and other tangible property purchased on behalf of the commission must be made available to the commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties of the commission must be assigned to the commission.(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of the commission must, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the commission.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions of the commission, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.(2) All employees of the office of the superintendent of public instruction employed on behalf of the commission are transferred to the jurisdiction of the commission subject to review by the executive director of the commission. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the commission to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.(3) All existing contracts and obligations executed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the commission shall remain in full force and must be performed by the commission.(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these entities shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.PART IIIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Sections 3 through 12 of this act take effect July 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2026, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---